Utah statutes.
31A-19a-216.   Charging of rates.
An authorized insurer, licensed insurance producer, employee, other
representative of an authorized insurer may not knowingly:
(1)  charge or demand a rate or receive a premium that departs from the rates,
rating plans, classifications, schedules, rules, and standards in effect on
behalf of the insurer; or
(2)  issue or make any policy or contract involving a violation of Subsection
(1).
